Idaho, session 2025, H0105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-2113, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2113. CORPORATE PRACTICE. (1) A veterinary medical practice may be
conducted only as a sole proprietorship, as a partnership or as a profes-
sional entity as defined in part 9, chapter 21, title 30, Idaho Code, or as
any other entity as defined by part 1, chapter 21, title 30, Idaho Code. No
business corporation, other than a professional entity, shall be organized
for the practice of veterinary medicine or shall provide veterinary medical
services.
(2) A not-for-profit corporation may own property in connection with
a veterinary medical facility or animal shelter, provided that an actively
licensed veterinarian makes all the decisions pertaining to diagnosis, care
and treatment of the patients.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.